Washington statutes.
RCW 15.150.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Cannabis lab" means a laboratory that tests cannabis for compliance with product standards established by rule by the state liquor and cannabis board.

(2) "Team" means the interagency coordination team for cannabis laboratory quality standards created in this chapter.

[ 2022 c 135 s 2.]

NOTES:

Purpose—2022 c 135: "The purpose of this act is to create an interagency coordination team responsible for the program that establishes and maintains quality standards for laboratories conducting analysis of recreational and medicinal cannabis with THC levels greater than 0.3 percent. The interagency team includes the department of agriculture, the liquor and cannabis board, and the department of health. The standards must be adopted by rule by the department of agriculture, and changes to standards may require reference in liquor and cannabis board and department of health rules. This authority to establish these rules transfers from the liquor and cannabis board to the department of agriculture. This act implements the recommendations of the cannabis science task force established in *RCW 43.21A.735.

According to the task force's recommendations: "Laboratory quality standards are the elements used in the evaluation of a product's compliance with established product standards. They consist of approved methods, method validation protocols, and performance measures and criteria applied to the testing of the product. Establishing appropriate and well-defined laboratory quality standards is essential to communicate to the testing laboratories what standardized practices and procedures are appropriate.

Laboratory quality standards help ensure the data that laboratories generate are credible and can be used to provide consumer protections. They should represent sound scientific protocols, and detail practical and specific guidance for the testing subject matter. Together, well-established product standards, laboratory quality standards, and accreditation standards should function to garner confidence for consumers and the industry they support."" [ 2022 c 135 s 1.]

*Reviser's note: RCW 43.21A.735 expired December 31, 2022.